Georgia statutes. TITLE 37 Mental Health
PART 3 Determination of Need for Treatment, Admission to
Treatment Facilities

37-7-80.
Designation of treatment facilities.

Any state owned or state operated facility may be designated by the department as a treatment facility. The department shall maintain a treatment facility at each regional hospital which shall accept patients found in any county in the service region
of the hospital. Any other facility within the State of Georgia may be so designated by the department at the request of or with the consent of the governing officers of the facility.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-404.19, enacted by Ga. L. 1971, p. 273, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-406.1, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1856, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1098, § 9.

37-7-81.
Procedure for detention of patient beyond evaluation period; hearing.

The patient may be detained at a facility beyond the evaluation period unless voluntary hospitalization is sought under subparagraph (a)(1)(A) of Code Section 37-7-64 only upon the recommendation of the chief medical officer of an evaluating facility
where the patient has been examined under Part 2 of this article, which recommendation is supported by the opinions of two physicians or a physician and a psychologist who have personally examined the patient within the preceding
five days and who agree that the patient is an alcoholic, a drug dependent individual, or a drug abuser requiring involuntary treatment but who does not meet the outpatient treatment requirements of paragraphs (1), (2), and (3)
of subsection (c) of Code Section 37-7-90. Such recommendation of the chief medical officer and the opinions of the physicians or physician and psychologist shall be entered on a certificate. The certificate shall be filed along
with a petition for a hearing in the court of the county in which the patient is being detained for evaluation. Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to prohibit a physician or psychologist or a chief medical officer who has
previously executed any other certificate authorized by the provisions of this chapter from executing a certificate provided for in this Code section for the same or any other patient. The certificate and petition shall be filed
within five days, Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays excluded, after the patient is admitted to a facility for evaluation under Code Section 37-7-63. Such filing shall authorize the detention of the patient by the facility pending
completion of a full and fair hearing under this Code section. Copies of the certificate shall be served on the patient and his representatives within five days after the certificate is filed and shall be accompanied by:

A notice that a hearing will be held and the time and place thereof;

A notice that the patient has a right to counsel, that the patient or his representatives may apply immediately to the court to have counsel appointed if the patient cannot afford counsel, and that in such case the court will appoint counsel for the patient
unless the patient indicates in writing that he does not desire to be represented by counsel;

A copy of the individualized treatment plan developed by the facility under this chapter shall be sent to the patient and shall be sent to the patient’s representative if requested by such representative. Notice of the right to receive such plan shall
be given to the representatives at the time the treatment plan is sent to the patient;

A notice that the patient has a right to be examined by a physician or psychologist of his own choice at his own expense and to have that physician or psychologist submit a suggested treatment plan for the patient which conforms with the requirements
of paragraph (14) of Code Section 37-7-1; and

A notice that the patient may waive in writing the hearing described in subsection (c) of this Code section.

If the hearing is waived, the certificate shall serve as authorization for the patient to begin treatment under the terms of the individualized treatment plan; and the chief medical officer of the facility where the patient is located shall be responsible
for the supervision of the treatment plan.

In any case in which a patient is retained in an evaluating facility pursuant to a petition filed under subsection (a) of this Code section, the court shall hold a full and fair hearing as provided in Code Section 37-7-81.1 unless the hearing is waived
in writing by the patient. The hearing shall be held no sooner than seven days and no later than 12 days after the petition is filed with the court.

History.
Code 1933, §§ 88-404.20, 88-404.21, enacted by Ga. L. 1971, p. 273, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-406.2, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1856, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 744, § 8; Ga. L. 1982, p. 937, §§ 3, 11; Ga. L. 1983, p. 3, § 28; Ga.
L. 1985, p. 1024, § 5; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1098, § 9; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1059, § 33; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1902, § 20.

Cross references.

Criminal penalty for malicious confinement of sane person in asylum, §

16-5-43

.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1986, “this article” was substituted for “Article 3 of this chapter” in the first sentence of subsection (a).

37-7-81.1.
Disposition of patient upon hearing.

At those hearings required under subsection (c) of Code Section 37-7-81 and subsection (a) of Code Section 37-7-92, the court shall determine whether the patient is an alcoholic, a drug dependent individual, or a drug abuser requiring involuntary treatment
and, if so, whether the patient is an inpatient or outpatient and, unless otherwise provided in this subsection, the type of involuntary treatment the patient should be ordered to obtain. At such hearing, if the court determines:

That the patient is not an alcoholic, a drug dependent individual, or a drug abuser requiring involuntary treatment, the court shall order that the patient be immediately discharged;

That the patient is an outpatient, the court shall further determine, based upon either the individualized treatment plan required to be prepared under subsection (c) of Code Section 37-7-64 or subsection (b) of Code Section 37-7-91 or the individualized
treatment plan proposed by the physician or psychologist chosen by the patient, whether there is available outpatient treatment for the patient which meets the requirements of the plan chosen by the court and whether the
patient will likely obtain that treatment so as to minimize the likelihood of the patient’s becoming an inpatient. If the court determines that there is such available outpatient treatment which the patient will likely
obtain so as to minimize the likelihood of the patient’s becoming an inpatient, then the court shall order the patient to obtain that treatment and shall discharge the patient subject to such order;

That the patient is an outpatient who does not meet the requirements for discharge under paragraph (2) of this subsection and:

The patient has been admitted to either an evaluating or treatment facility and there received an evaluation within 45 days prior to the date of the hearing under this Code section, the court shall order that the patient be discharged; or

The patient has not been admitted to either an evaluating or treatment facility and there received an evaluation within 45 days prior to the date of the hearing under this Code section, the court shall order that the patient be admitted to an evaluating
facility, and this chapter shall thereafter apply to that patient as though that patient had been ordered by a court to be admitted to that facility pursuant to Code Section 37-7-62; or

That the patient is an inpatient, the court shall order that the patient shall be transported to a treatment facility where the patient shall be admitted for care and treatment, which order may also require that a period of such inpatient treatment be
followed by available outpatient treatment if there is such outpatient treatment which will meet the requirements of the patient’s individualized service plan and the patient will likely obtain the treatment so as to minimize
the likelihood of the patient’s becoming an inpatient.

If the court at a hearing under subsection (a) of this Code section concludes that the patient is an alcoholic, a drug dependent individual, or a drug abuser requiring involuntary treatment, it shall make findings of fact and conclusions of law in support
of that conclusion as part of its final order.

The court may order the hospitalization of any patient pursuant to paragraph (4) of subsection (a) of this Code section for any period not to exceed six months, subject to the power of the chief medical officer to discharge the patient under subsection
(b) of Code Section 37-7-85. If continued hospitalization is necessary at the end of that period, the chief medical officer shall apply for an order authorizing such continued hospitalization under Code Section 37-7-83.

The court may order the patient to obtain available outpatient treatment under the additional conditions specified in Code Sections 37-7-93 and 37-7-94.

History. Code 1981, §

37-7-81.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1986, p. 1098, § 9; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 37; Ga. L. 1987, p. 797, § 5; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1059, § 34.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section

28-9-3

, in 1987, the amendment of subparagraph (a)(3)(A) of this Code section by Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 27, was treated as impliedly repealed and superseded by Ga. L. 1987, p. 797, § 5, due to irreconcilable conflict. See County
of Butts v. Strahan,

151 Ga. 417
(1921); Keener v. McDougall,

232 Ga. 273
(1974).

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1992, a semicolon was substituted for a period at the end of paragraph (a)(2).

37-7-82.
Procedure upon failure of or noncompliance with involuntary outpatient treatment plan.

If at any time during a period of involuntary outpatient treatment, including but not limited to interim outpatient treatment arranged pursuant to subsection (b) of Code Section 37-7-91, the physician or psychologist in charge of the patient’s outpatient
treatment plan determines that, because of a change in the patient’s condition, the least restrictive alternative which would accomplish the treatment goals is hospitalization of the patient, then that physician or psychologist
may execute a certificate under the conditions specified in subsection (a) of Code Section 37-7-41. That certificate shall have the same duration and effect as a certificate issued pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 37-7-41.

If at any time during a period of involuntary outpatient treatment, including but not limited to interim outpatient treatment arranged pursuant to subsection (b) of Code Section 37-7-91, the patient fails without good cause or refuses to comply with the
outpatient treatment plan, the physician or psychologist in charge of the outpatient treatment plan or that physician’s or psychologist’s designee may petition the court originally approving the involuntary treatment of the patient
or the court of the county in which the patient is a resident or where the patient may be found for an order authorizing a peace officer to take the patient and immediately deliver the patient to the community mental health center
in charge of the patient’s outpatient treatment plan, if a physician or psychologist is available there to examine the patient, or to the nearest emergency receiving facility serving the county in which the patient is found. If
in the discretion of the court such an order is issued, the patient shall be delivered to the facility and may be given such emergency or other medical treatment as is indicated by good medical practice. The patient must be released
from the custody of the community mental health center within four hours and from the custody of the emergency receiving facility within 48 hours after being taken into the custody of that center or facility unless the examining
physician or psychologist concludes that, because of a change in the patient’s condition, the least restrictive alternative which would accomplish the treatment goals is hospitalization of the patient. The physician or a psychologist
may then execute a certificate under the conditions specified therefor in subsection (a) of Code Section 37-7-41, if the examination is done in a community mental health center, or under the conditions specified therefor in Code
Section 37-7-43, if the examination is done in an emergency receiving facility. That certificate shall have the same duration and effect as a certificate issued pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 37-7-41 or Code Section
37-7-43, as applicable.

With regard to a patient required to obtain involuntary outpatient treatment, the court may issue any order authorized under subsection (b) of Code Section 37-7-41, but if the court knows that patient is required to obtain involuntary outpatient treatment,
that court may issue such order only upon the court’s determination, in addition to any other conditions for the issuance of that order, that such patient has not complied with the involuntary outpatient treatment or that the patient
reasonably appears to be an inpatient.

Any patient detained in a facility pursuant to this Code section shall not be required during that period of detention to obtain outpatient treatment required by any order which is then in effect and which was issued pursuant to this chapter. That order
shall otherwise remain in full force and effect notwithstanding the patient’s detention in or release from the facility unless that facility obtains a court order authorized by Code Section 37-7-81.1 which expressly supersedes
the prior order.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-406.3, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1856, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 785, § 1; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1024, § 6; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1098, § 9; Ga. L. 1987, p. 797, § 6; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1059, § 35; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1902, § 21.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1988, “complied” was substituted for “compiled” in subsection (c).

Law reviews.

For comment, “1986 Amendments to Georgia’s Mental Health Statutes: The Latest Attempt to Provide a Solution to the Problem of the Chronically Mentally Ill,” see 36 Emory L.J. 1313 (1987).

37-7-83.
Procedure for continued involuntary hospitalization.

If it is necessary to continue involuntary treatment of a hospitalized patient beyond the end of the period during which the treatment facility is currently authorized under this chapter to retain the patient, the chief medical officer prior to the expiration
of the period, shall seek an order authorizing such continued treatment in the manner provided in this Code section. The chief medical officer may seek such an order authorizing continued involuntary treatment involving inpatient
treatment, outpatient treatment, or both under the procedures of this Code section and Code Section 37-7-93.

If the chief medical officer finds that continued involuntary treatment is necessary (1) for an individual who was admitted while serving a criminal sentence but whose sentence is about to expire or (2) for an individual who was hospitalized while under
the jurisdiction of a juvenile court but who is about to reach the age of 17, the chief medical officer shall seek an order authorizing such continued treatment in the manner provided in this Code section; and this chapter shall
apply fully to such a patient after that time.

A Committee for Continued Involuntary Treatment Review shall be established by the chief medical officer of each hospital and shall consist of not less than five persons of professional status, at least one of whom shall be a physician and at least two
others of whom shall be either physicians or psychologists. The committee may conduct its meetings with a quorum of any three members at least one of whom shall be a physician. The function of this committee shall be to review
and evaluate the updated individualized treatment plan of each patient of the hospital and to report to the chief medical officer its recommendations concerning the patient’s need for continued involuntary treatment. No person
who has responsibility for the care and treatment of the individual patient for whom continued involuntary treatment is requested shall serve on any committee which reviews such individual’s case.

If the chief medical officer desires to seek an order under this Code section authorizing continued involuntary treatment for up to 12 months beyond the expiration of the currently authorized period of hospitalization, he shall first file a notice of
such intended action with the Committee for Continued Involuntary Treatment Review, which notice shall be forwarded to the committee at least 60 days prior to the expiration of that period.

Within ten days of the date of the notice, the committee shall meet to consider the matter of the chief medical officer’s intention to seek an order for continued involuntary treatment. Prior to the committee’s meeting, the patient and his representatives
shall be notified of the following: the purpose of such meeting, the time and place of such meeting, their right to be present at such meeting, and their right to present any alternative individualized treatment plan secured at
their expense. In those cases in which the patient will not or cannot appear, at least one member of the committee will make all reasonable efforts to interview the patient and report to the committee. The physician or psychologist
proposing the treatment plan shall present an updated individualized treatment plan for the patient to the committee. The committee shall report to the chief medical officer or his designee, other than the physician or psychologist
proposing the treatment plan or a member of the committee, its written recommendations along with any minority recommendations which may also be submitted. Such report will specify whether or not the patient is an alcoholic, a
drug dependent individual, or a drug abuser requiring involuntary treatment and whether continued hospitalization is the least restrictive alternative available.

If, after considering the committee’s recommendations and minority recommendations, if any, the chief medical officer or his designee, other than the attending physician or a member of the committee, determines that the patient is not an alcoholic, a
drug dependent individual, or a drug abuser requiring involuntary treatment, the patient shall be immediately discharged from involuntary hospitalization pursuant to subsection (b) of Code Section 37-7-85. Such person may apply
for voluntary admission pursuant to Code Section 37-7-24.

If after considering the committee’s recommendations and minority recommendations, if any, the chief medical officer or his designee, other than the attending physician or member of the committee, determines that the patient is an alcoholic, a drug dependent
individual, or a drug abuser requiring involuntary treatment, he shall, within ten days after receiving the committee’s recommendations, serve a petition for an order authorizing continued involuntary treatment along with copies
of the updated individualized treatment plan and the committee’s report on the designated office within the department and shall also serve such petition along with a copy of the updated individualized treatment plan on the patient.
A copy of the petition shall be served on the patient’s representatives. The petition shall contain a plain and simple statement that the patient or his representatives may file a request for a hearing with a hearing examiner appointed
pursuant to Code Section 37-7-84 within 15 days after service of the petition, that the patient has a right to counsel, that the patient or his representatives may apply immediately to the court to have counsel appointed if the
patient cannot afford counsel, and that the court will appoint counsel for the patient unless the patient indicates in writing that he does not desire to be represented by counsel or has made his own arrangements for counsel.

If a hearing is not requested by the patient or the representatives within 15 days of service of the petition on the patient and his representatives, the hearing examiner shall make an independent review of the committee’s report, the updated individualized
treatment plan, and the petition. If he concludes that continued involuntary treatment may not be necessary or if he finds any member of the committee so concluded, then he shall order that a hearing be held pursuant to subsection
(i) of this Code section. If he concludes that continued involuntary treatment is necessary, then he shall order continued involuntary treatment involving inpatient treatment, outpatient treatment, or both for a period not to exceed
one year.

If a hearing is requested within 15 days of service of the petition on the patient and his representatives or if the hearing examiner orders a hearing pursuant to subsection (h) or (j) of this Code section, the hearing examiner shall set a time and place
for the hearing to be held within 25 days of the time the hearing examiner receives the request but in any event no later than the day on which the current order of involuntary inpatient treatment expires. Notice of the hearing
shall be served on the patient, his representatives, the facility, and, when appropriate, on counsel for the patient. The hearing examiner, within his discretion, may grant a change of venue for the convenience of parties or witnesses.
Such hearing shall be a full and fair hearing, except that the patient’s attorney, when the patient is unable to attend the hearing and is incapable of consenting to a waiver of his appearance, may move that the patient not be
required to appear; however, the record shall reflect the reasons for the hearing examiner’s actions. After such hearing, the hearing examiner may issue any order which the court is authorized to issue under Code Section 37-7-81.1
and subject to the limitations of that Code Section 37-7-81.1, provided that a patient who is an outpatient who does not meet the requirements for discharge under paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 37-7-81.1 shall
nevertheless be discharged and provided that the hearing examiner may order the patient’s continued inpatient treatment, outpatient treatment, or both for a period not to exceed one year, subject to the power to discharge the patient
under subsection (b) of Code Section 37-7-85 or under Code Section 37-7-94. In the event that an order approving continued hospitalization is entered for an individual who was admitted while serving a criminal sentence under the
jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections, but whose sentence is about to expire, the chief medical officer shall serve a copy of that order upon the Department of Corrections within five working days of the issuance of the
order.

The hearing examiner for a patient who was admitted under the jurisdiction of the juvenile court and who reaches the age of 17 without having had a full and fair hearing pursuant to any provisions of this chapter or without having waived such hearing
shall order that a hearing be held pursuant to subsection (i) of this Code section.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-404.23, enacted by Ga. L. 1971, p. 273, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-406.5, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1856, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 744, § 10; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1098, § 9; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1059, § 36.

Cross references.

Criminal penalty for malicious confinement of sane person in asylum, §

16-5-43

.

37-7-84.
Appointment of hearing examiners for hearings as to continued hospitalization; powers of hearing examiners generally; issuance of subpoenas.

One or more hearing examiners shall be appointed by the Justices of the Supreme Court to hold the hearings under Code Section 37-7-83. Such hearing examiners shall be members of the State Bar of Georgia and shall be compensated by the department.

The hearing examiners shall have the authority to:

Administer oaths and affirmations;

Sign and issue subpoenas;

Rule upon offers of proof;

Regulate the course of the hearing;

Provide for the taking of testimony by deposition;

Reprimand or exclude from the hearing any person for any indecorous or improper conduct committed in the presence of the hearing examiner; and

Make all appropriate orders authorized by this chapter.

If a subpoena issued by the hearing examiner is disobeyed, the hearing examiner may apply to the superior court of the county in which the hearing is held for an order requiring obedience. Failure to comply with such order shall be cause for punishment
as for contempt of court.

In the event a patient desires counsel in a hearing before the hearing examiner but cannot afford such counsel, the hearing examiner shall apply to the court of the county in which the hearing is held and that court shall appoint counsel for the patient.
Payment for such representation shall be made by the county of the patient’s legal residence.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-404.22, enacted by Ga. L. 1971, p. 273, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-406.4, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1856, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 744, § 9; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1098, § 9.

37-7-85.
Periodic review of treatment plan; procedure upon termination of need for involuntary treatment; designation of discharge decisionmaker; notice of discharge or transfer to voluntary status.

Each individualized treatment plan for a patient receiving involuntary inpatient treatment shall be reviewed at regular intervals to determine the patient’s progress toward the stated goals and objectives of the plan and to determine whether the plan
should be modified because of the patient’s present condition. These reviews should be based upon relevant progress notes in the patient’s clinical record and upon other related information; and input from the patient should be
obtained and utilized where feasible.

Any time a patient receiving involuntary inpatient treatment is found by the chief medical officer, after consideration of the recommendations of the treatment team, no longer to be an alcoholic, a drug dependent individual, or a drug abuser requiring
involuntary inpatient treatment, the chief medical officer may:

Discharge the patient from involuntary outpatient or inpatient treatment, or both, subject to the conditions of Code Section 37-7-95;

Discharge the patient from involuntary inpatient treatment and require that the patient obtain available outpatient treatment for the remaining period the patient was to have been required to obtain inpatient treatment, as long as the patient then meets
the standards for being discharged to outpatient treatment under paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 37-7-81.1 and subject to the conditions of Code Section 37-7-95; or

Transfer the patient to voluntary status at the patient’s request, as provided in Code Section 37-7-24.

The chief medical officer may designate in writing another physician, who may be the attending physician, to make these discharge decisions. If the decision of the designee is contrary to the recommendations of the treatment team, the issue must go to
the chief medical officer for final determination. Where the treatment team and the designee concur, the decision of the designee will be final.

Notice of the discharge or the transfer of status shall be given to the patient and his representatives; if the patient’s hospitalization was authorized by order of a court, to the court which entered such order; and, if the patient was under criminal
charges of which the facility received written notification, by certified mail or statutory overnight delivery to the law enforcement agency originally having custody of the patient.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-404.24, enacted by Ga. L. 1971, p. 273, § 1; Ga. L. 1977, p. 1293, § 7; Code 1933, § 88-406.6, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1856, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 1098, § 9; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1059, § 5; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589,
§ 3.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that the amendment to this Code section is applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.